Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TARGETED GRANT PROGRAM TO ADDRESS OUTBREAKS OF VACCINE-PREVENTABLE DISEASES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grant program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health must establish and administer a two-year, targeted grant program to fund vaccination-related activities to lower the risk of outbreaks of vaccine-preventable diseases, including but not limited to measles, in communities with low vaccination rates. Grant funds must be used for activities in geographic areas or populations experiencing or at risk of experiencing an outbreak of a vaccine-preventable disease due to low vaccination rates. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible grant recipients. new text end new text begin Entities eligible for a grant under this section are community health boards as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 145A.02, subdivision 5, and community-based nonprofit organizations experienced in serving geographic areas or populations with low vaccination rates. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin An entity seeking a grant under this section must apply to the commissioner in a form and manner established by the commissioner. The application must include a description of the activities proposed by the entity, the geographic area or population to be served, the amount of funding sought, and a proposed budget detailing how the funds will be spent. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Allowable uses of grant funds. new text end new text begin Grant recipients must use grant funds for vaccine information, education, and awareness activities; for activities to address vaccine misinformation; and to assist individuals in obtaining vaccines. The information, education, and activities must be culturally appropriate for the area or population being served. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Development of information and education materials. new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop or provide grant recipients with culturally appropriate information and educational materials on vaccines based on materials available from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. The information and educational materials must be available in the primary languages of populations experiencing or at risk of experiencing a vaccine-preventable disease outbreak and must at least address: new text end new text begin (1) the benefits of vaccines to individuals and communities; new text end new text begin (2) health information about the safety of vaccines; new text end new text begin (3) recommended vaccine schedules for children, adolescents, and adults; new text end new text begin (4) programs that provide free or reduced-cost vaccines to eligible individuals; and new text end new text begin (5) health clinics, health care providers, and other locations where vaccines may be obtained. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a targeted grant program to address outbreaks of vaccine-preventable diseases. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end